Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.55, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Assessments. (a) The commissioner of public safety must annually assess deleted text begin $4,000,000deleted text end new text begin $2,800,000new text end to railroad deleted text begin and pipelinedeleted text end companies based on the formula specified in paragraph (b). The commissioner must deposit funds collected under this subdivision in the railroad and pipeline safety account under subdivision 2. (b) The assessment for each railroad is deleted text begin 70deleted text end new text begin 100new text end percent of the total annual assessment amount, divided in equal proportion between applicable rail carriers based on route miles operated in Minnesota. deleted text begin The assessment for each pipeline company is 30 percent of the total annual assessment amount, divided in equal proportion between companies based on the yearly aggregate gallons of oil and other hazardous substances transported by pipeline in Minnesota.deleted text end (c) In addition to the amount identified in paragraph (a), the commissioner must assess deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end rail carrier or pipeline company involved in an incident compelling a significant response for all postincident review and analysis costs under subdivision 5 incurred by the state and local units of government. This paragraph applies regardless of whether an assessment is imposed under paragraph (a) in a fiscal year. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for all assessments occurring on or after that date. new text end